New York, session 2025-2026, A4746.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 720 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 720. Cyber security enhancement. 1. The commissioner of the division 4 of homeland security and emergency services shall establish a program 5 for the purpose of upgrading cyber security in local governments, 6 including but not limited to, villages, towns and cities with a popu- 7 lation of one million or less. 8 2. All costs of such program shall be paid for by the cyber security 9 enhancement fund, established by section ninety-one-h of the state 10 finance law. 11 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 91-h to 12 read as follows: 13 § 91-h. Cyber security enhancement fund. 1. There is hereby estab- 14 lished in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the commission- 15 er of taxation and finance a fund to be known as the cyber security 16 enhancement fund. 17 2. Such fund shall consist of five million dollars transferred by the 18 state comptroller from the general fund, and contributions consisting of 19 grants, including grants or other financial assistance from any agency 20 of government and all moneys required by the provisions of this section 21 or any other law to be paid into or credited to the fund. 22 3. The moneys from the cyber security enhancement fund shall be 23 disbursed by the division of homeland security and emergency services to 24 be expended to upgrade the cyber security of local governments, includ- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00527-01-5 A. 4746 2 1 ing but not limited to, villages, towns and cities with a population of 2 one million or less, pursuant to section seven hundred twenty of the 3 executive law. 4 § 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after January first, 5 two thousand twenty-eight, local and state taxpayer moneys shall not be 6 used to pay ransoms in response to ransomware attacks. 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.